Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-6302
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act:

(1) Director means the Director of Economic Development;

(2) Distressed area means a municipality, a county with a
population of fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants according to the
most recent federal decennial census, an unincorporated area within a county,
or a census tract in Nebraska that (a) has an unemployment rate which exceeds
the statewide average unemployment rate, (b) has a per capita income below
the statewide average per capita income, or (c) had a population decrease
between the two most recent federal decennial censuses;

(3) Family member means a family member within the meaning
of section 267(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

(4) Investment
date means the latest of the following:

(a) The date of a fully executed investor
subscription agreement or underlying transaction document pertaining to the
applicable qualified investment;

(b) The date on a check made out to a qualified
small business for the applicable qualified investment or the date a wire
transfer is completed for the applicable qualified investment; or

(c) The date
the qualified small business deposits a check made out to such qualified small
business for the applicable qualified investment or receives a wire transfer
for the applicable qualified investment, as documented on the deposit slip
or bank statement of the qualified small business;

(5) Pass-through entity means
an organization that for the applicable taxable year is a subchapter S corporation,
general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, trust,
or limited liability company and that for the applicable taxable year is not
taxed as a corporation;

(6) Qualified fund means a
fund that has been certified by the director under section 77-6304;

(7) Qualified high-technology
field includes, but is not limited to, aerospace, agricultural processing,
renewable energy, energy efficiency and conservation, environmental engineering,
food technology, cellulosic ethanol, information technology, materials science
technology, nanotechnology, telecommunications, biosolutions, medical device
products, pharmaceuticals, diagnostics, biologicals, chemistry, veterinary
science, and similar fields;

(8) Qualified investment means
a cash investment in a qualified small business made in exchange for common
stock, a partnership or membership interest, preferred stock, debt with mandatory
conversion to equity, or an equivalent ownership interest as determined by
the director of a minimum of:

(a) Twenty-five thousand dollars in a calendar year by a qualified
investor; or

(b) Fifty thousand dollars in a calendar year by a qualified
fund;

(9) Qualified investor means
an individual, trust, or pass-through entity which has been certified by the
director under section 77-6305; and

(10) Qualified small business
means a business that has been certified by the director under section 77-6303.

Laws 2011, LB389, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB1067, § 5.
January 1, 2014